California statutes. Education Code
(a) The State Allocation Board may establish a program that requires a school district, county office of education, or charter school that sells real property that was purchased with or modernized with, or on which improvements were constructed that were funded with, any moneys from a state school facilities funding program, to return to the State Allocation Board the moneys the school district, county office of education, or charter school received from the state school facilities funding program for the purchase, modernization, or construction if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The real property is not sold to a charter school pursuant to Section 17457.5, a school
 district, a county office of education, or an agency that will use the property exclusively for the delivery of child care and development services pursuant to Section 17458.

(2) The proceeds from the sale of the real property are not used for capital outlay.

(3) The real property was purchased, or the improvements were constructed or modernized on the real property, within 10 years before the real property is sold.

(b) The moneys to be returned to the State Allocation Board under this section are those received within 10 years before the real property is sold.

(c) If a portion of the real property is sold, a proportionate amount of funds received from a
 state school facilities funding program shall be returned to the State Allocation Board under this section based on the percentage of the real property sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (AB 1664)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17462.7.

The board shall reduce an apportionment of hardship assistance awarded to a school district pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) by an amount equal to the amount of any proceeds from the sale of surplus property used for a one-time expenditure of the school district pursuant to Section 17462.5 for five years following the expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 891, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17463.

Notwithstanding Section 17462, a school district having an average daily attendance of less than 10,001 in any fiscal year may deposit any and all interest earned on the funds derived from the sale in that fiscal year of surplus property into the general fund of the school district for any general fund purpose, subject to the following conditions:

(a) Before that deposit, the school district shall submit to the State Allocation Board a capital outlay plan for the school district for a period of five years following that sale, together with a declaration of the finding by the governing board of the school district that the school facilities needs of the school district can be met over that five-year period
 without funding or other assistance from any state school facilities funding program. No later than the date upon which that initial five-year period concludes, the school district shall submit to the State Allocation Board a capital outlay plan for the school district for the subsequent five-year period.

(b) Before the decision to place that interest money into the school district’s general fund, the governing board of the school district shall consider the extent to which it is necessary or appropriate to expend that money to meet the school district’s needs relative to capital outlay, facilities, modernization, and deferred maintenance. In addition, as to any interest money deposited into the school district’s general fund pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall consider the extent to which it is necessary or appropriate to expend the money to meet the school district’s needs relative to ongoing maintenance
 before expending that money for any other purpose.

(c) A school district that deposits interest into its general fund pursuant to the authority set forth in this section shall not be eligible during the 10-year period described in subdivision (a) for funding or other assistance under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10, or any other state school facilities funding program.

(d) If a school district seeks state funding pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 10, Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10, or any other state school facilities funding program, on or after the expiration of the 10-year period specified in subdivision (c), any state funding received by the school district from the program shall be reduced by any remaining funds derived from the sale of that surplus property
 by the school district and any unencumbered interest earned on those funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 11.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17463.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “designated school district” means the Inglewood Unified School District, the Oakland Unified School District, the South Monterey County Joint Union High School District, and the Vallejo City Unified School District.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 17456, 17457, 17462, 17462.7, and 17463, or any other law, until the emergency apportionment loan is repaid, a designated school district with an outstanding emergency apportionment loan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as of July 1, 2018, may sell or lease surplus real property, together with any personal property located on the real property, owned by the designated school
 district and use the proceeds from the sale or lease to service, reduce, or retire the debt on the emergency apportionment loan, or for capital improvements of the facilities of the designated school district pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 17462.

(2) The sale or lease of surplus real property pursuant to this subdivision shall be sold or leased pursuant to Section 17458, 17464, or 17489, as applicable.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated school district that uses the proceeds from the sale or lease of surplus real property pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for financial hardship assistance pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as modifying the responsibility of a designated school
 district to accommodate pupils in accordance with Section 47614.

(e) Nothing in this section shall exclude the designated school districts with outstanding emergency apportionment loans, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, as of July 1, 2018, except as provided in subdivision (c), from participating in or benefitting from any program authorized pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000), Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10, or any other state school facilities funding program.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall not be subject to waiver by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or by the Superintendent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 5.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17463.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district may deposit the proceeds from the sale or lease of surplus real property, together with any personal property located on the property, purchased with nonstate funds, into the general fund of the school district and may use the proceeds for any one-time general fund purpose. If the purchase of the property was made using the proceeds of a local general obligation bond or revenue derived from developer fees, the amount of the proceeds of the transaction that may be deposited into the general fund of the school district may not exceed the percentage computed by the difference between the purchase price of the property and the proceeds from the transaction, divided by the amount of the proceeds of the transaction. For purposes of this section, proceeds of the transaction means
 either of the following, as appropriate:

(1) The amount realized from the sale of property after reasonable expenses related to the sale.

(2) For a transaction that does not result in a lump-sum payment of the proceeds of the transaction, the proceeds of the transaction shall be calculated as the net present value of the future cashflow generated by the transaction.

(b) The State Allocation Board shall reduce an apportionment of hardship assistance awarded to the particular school district pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10, except an apportionment of hardship
 assistance awarded pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17075.10, by an amount equal to the amount of the sale of surplus real property used for a one-time expenditure of the school district pursuant to this section.

(c) Before a school district exercises the authority granted pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall first submit to the State Allocation Board documents certifying both of the following:

(1) The sale of real property pursuant to this section does not violate the provisions of a local bond act.

(2) The real property is not suitable to meet projected school construction needs for the next 10 years.

(d) Before the school district exercises the authority granted pursuant to this section,
 the governing board of the school district shall adopt a plan at a public meeting for expending one-time resources pursuant to this section. The plan shall identify the source and the intended use of the surplus property proceeds and describe the reasons why the expenditure will not result in ongoing fiscal obligations for the school district.

(e) (1) Except for the sale or lease of surplus real property that has previously operated, or was constructed to be operated, as an early childhood education facility or a school for elementary and secondary instruction, the governing board of a school district shall not be required to appoint a school district advisory committee pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 17387).

(2) It is the intent of the
 Legislature to allow a school district to meet the requirements to offer surplus properties set forth in the Education and Government Codes by making an offer simultaneously to all applicable entities.

(f) The Office of Public School Construction shall submit an interim and a final report to the State Allocation Board and the budget, education policy, and fiscal committees of the Legislature that identifies the school districts that have exercised the authority granted by this section, the amount of proceeds involved, and the purposes for which those proceeds were used. The interim report shall be submitted by June 1, 2022, and the final report shall be submitted by January 1, 2026.

(g) For any transaction for the sale or lease of surplus property a school district initiates pursuant to this section before June 30, 2024, the proceeds from the sale or lease transaction that are
 received after June 30, 2024, shall be considered proceeds that can be deposited in accordance with this section.

(h) Subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, subdivision (f) shall become inoperative on January 15, 2026, and this section as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 17.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17464.

Except as provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 17230) of Chapter 1, the sale or lease with an option to purchase of real property by a school district shall be in accordance with the following priorities and procedures:

(a) First, the property shall be offered for sale or lease pursuant to Section 17457.5 to any interested charter school for purposes of providing direct instruction or instructional support.

(b) Second, the
 property shall be offered for park or recreational purposes pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, in any instance in which that article is applicable.

(c) Third, the property shall be offered for sale or lease with an option to purchase, at fair market value in both of the following ways:

(1) In writing, to the Director of General Services, the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the county and city in which the property is situated, to any public housing authority in the county in which the property is situated, and to any entity referenced in paragraph (2) that has submitted a written request to the school district to be directly notified of the offer for sale or lease with an option to purchase the real property by the school district.

(2) By public notice to any public district, public authority, public agency, public corporation, or any other political subdivision in this state, to the federal government, and to nonprofit charitable corporations existing on December 31, 1979, and organized pursuant to
 Part 3 (commencing with Section 10200) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code then in effect or organized on or after January 1, 1980, as a public benefit corporation under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code. Public notice shall consist of at least publishing its intention to dispose of the real property in a newspaper of general circulation within the school district, or if there is no newspaper of general circulation in the school district, then in any newspaper of general circulation that is regularly circulated in the school district. The notice shall specify that the property is being made available to all public
 districts, public authorities, public agencies, and other political subdivisions or public corporations in this state, and to other nonprofit charitable or nonprofit public benefit corporations.

(d) Publication of notice pursuant to this section shall be once each week for three successive weeks. Three publications in a newspaper regularly published once a week or more often, with at least five days intervening between the respective publication dates not counting the publication dates, are sufficient. The written notice required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c)
 shall be mailed no later than the date of the second published notice.

(e) The entity desiring to purchase or lease the property shall, within 60 days after the third publication of notice, notify the school district of its intent to purchase or lease the property. If the entity desiring to purchase or lease the property and the school
 district are unable to arrive at a mutually satisfactory price or lease payment during the 60-day period, the property may be disposed of as otherwise provided in this section. In the event the school district receives offers from more than one entity pursuant to this subdivision, the school district governing board may determine which of these offers to accept.

(f) Fourth, the property may be disposed of in any other manner authorized by law.

(g) This section shall become operative January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 37.7.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17465.

(a) As used in this section, the terms “district,” “special education local plan area,” and “county office” have the same meaning as prescribed by Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000).

(b) The governing board of a school district that adopts a resolution of intent to lease vacant classrooms shall first offer to lease the classrooms for special education programs that are provided by either other districts that comprise part of the special education local plan area in which the
 leasing district is included or by the county office having jurisdiction over the leasing district, to the pupils of the leasing district, in whole or in part.

(c) Upon adoption of the resolution, the governing board shall notify, in writing, other districts or the county office, as specified in subdivision (b), of its intent to lease vacant classrooms. The notice shall describe the vacant classrooms, shall specify that the lease shall not exceed a term of 99 years and that the lease payment and other terms of the lease are subject to negotiation, and shall state that the offer to lease is valid for no more than 60 days after receipt thereof.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 17466, the governing board may include in its resolution a time for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting at which sealed proposals to lease will be received and
 considered, and, notwithstanding Section 17469, may post copies of the resolution and publish notice of the adoption of the resolution. However, the governing board shall not act on any proposal prior to the first of the following conditions occurring:

(1) Receipt from the county superintendent or the public education agency, as appropriate, of its intent to lease the classrooms or of its intent not to do so.

(2) Expiration of the 60-day period prescribed by subdivision (c).

(e) An entity desiring to lease the vacant classrooms shall, within 60 days from receipt of the notification, inform the governing board, in writing, of its intent to lease or not to lease the classrooms.

(f) (1) The lease payments and other terms of the lease
 for vacant classrooms leased to other districts or to the county office, as specified in subdivision (b), shall be negotiated by the entity desiring to lease the vacant classrooms and the governing board. Any entity eligible to lease vacant classrooms pursuant to this section and any governing board may negotiate lease payments prior to the availability of the vacant classrooms.

(2) The lease payments shall not exceed the district’s actual costs for maintenance, operation, and custodial services for the leased classrooms.

(3) If more than one governing board offers to lease classrooms, the entity desiring to lease such classrooms may elect to negotiate either individually with each district, or jointly, with some or all of such districts. If the entity elects joint negotiations, the lease payments shall not exceed the participating districts’ average actual costs for maintenance,
 operation, and custodial services for the leased classrooms.

(g) If the governing board and the entity desiring to lease the classrooms are unable to complete negotiations for the lease and arrive at a mutually satisfactory lease within the same 60-day period that the entity has to inform the governing board of its intent to lease or not lease, the governing board may lease the classrooms in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(h) If vacant classrooms are available in both operating and nonoperating schools, the governing board, prior to adopting a resolution of intent to lease, shall consider which school would provide the environment least restrictive to the needs of handicapped pupils or individuals with exceptional needs, as appropriate, for whom the county superintendent or public education agency provides special education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17466.

Before ordering the sale or lease of any property the governing board, in a regular open meeting, by a two-thirds vote of all its members, shall adopt a resolution, declaring its intention to sell or lease the property, as the case may be. The resolution shall describe the property proposed to be sold or leased in such manner as to identify it and shall specify the minimum price or rental and the terms upon which it will be sold or leased and the commission, or rate thereof, if any, which the board will pay to a licensed real estate broker out of the minimum price or
 rental. The resolution shall fix a time not less than three weeks thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting, at which sealed proposals to purchase or lease will be received and considered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17467.

(a) In lieu of the declaration of intention to lease real property provided in Section 17466, the governing board of any school district having an average daily attendance of 250,000 or more as shown by the annual report of the county superintendent of schools for the preceding year may publish a notice three times in a period of not less than 15 days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The notice shall describe the property proposed to be leased in a manner as to identify it and shall specify the minimum rental and terms upon which it will be leased. The notice shall fix a time not less than 15 days thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its
 regular place of meeting at which the proposal to lease will be received and considered.

(b) The governing board by majority vote may adopt a ruling delegating to an officer or employee of the school district as the governing board may designate, authority to perform the duties prescribed in this section.

(c) Bids received under this section shall be received, accepted, or rejected in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17468.

If, in the discretion of the board, it is advisable to offer to pay a commission to a licensed real estate broker who is instrumental in obtaining any proposal, the commission shall be specified in the resolution. No commission shall be paid unless there is contained in or with the sealed proposal or stated in or with the oral bid, which is finally accepted, the name of the licensed real estate broker to whom it is to be paid, and the amount or rate thereof. Any commission shall, however, be paid only out of money received by the board from the sale or rental of the
 real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17469.

Notice of the adoption of the resolution and of the time and place of holding the meeting shall be given by posting copies of the resolution signed by the board or by a majority thereof in three public places in the district, not less than 15 days before the date of the meeting, and by publishing the notice not less than once a week for three successive weeks before the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated, if any such newspaper is published therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17470.

(a) The governing board of a school district that intends to sell real property pursuant to this article shall take reasonable steps to ensure that the former owner from whom the district acquired the property receives notice of the public meeting prescribed by Section 17466, in writing, by certified mail, at least 60 days prior to the meeting.

(b) The governing board of a school district shall not be required to accord the former owner the right to purchase the property at the
 tentatively accepted highest bid price nor to offer to sell the property to the former owner at the tentatively accepted highest bid price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17471.

Whenever it is proposed to lease real property and the governing board unanimously determines in the resolution that in its opinion, the monthly rental value of the property does not exceed the sum of fifty dollars ($50), the resolution need not be posted and may, before the date of the meeting, be published in two successive issues of a weekly newspaper or in five successive issues of a daily newspaper. The newspaper in which the notice is published shall be one published in the district and having a general circulation there; or if there is no newspaper, then one
 having a general circulation in the district; or if there is no newspaper, then in one having a general circulation in a county in which the district or any part thereof is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17472.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the governing body, all sealed proposals which have been received shall, in public session, be opened, examined, and declared by the board. Of the proposals submitted which conform to all terms and conditions specified in the resolution of intention to sell or to lease and which are made by responsible bidders, the proposal which is the highest, after deducting therefrom the commission, if any, to be paid a licensed real estate broker in connection therewith, shall be finally accepted, unless a higher
 oral bid is accepted or the board rejects all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17473.

Before accepting any written proposal, the board shall call for oral bids. If, upon the call for oral bidding, any responsible person offers to purchase the property or to lease the property, as the case may be, upon the terms and conditions specified in the resolution, for a price or rental exceeding by at least 5 percent, the highest written proposal, after deducting the commission, if any, to be paid a licensed real estate broker in connection therewith, then the oral bid which is the highest after deducting any commission to be paid a licensed real estate broker,
 in connection therewith, which is made by a responsible person, shall be finally accepted. Final acceptance shall not be made, however, until the oral bid is reduced to writing and signed by the offeror.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17474.

In the event of a sale on a higher oral bid to a purchaser procured by a licensed real estate broker, other than the broker who submitted the highest written proposal, and who is qualified as provided in Section 17468 of this code, the board shall allow a commission on the full amount for which the sale is confirmed. One-half of the commission on the amount of the highest written proposal shall be paid to the broker who submitted it, and the balance of the commission on the purchase price to the broker who procured the purchaser to whom the sale was
 confirmed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17475.

The final acceptance by the governing body may be made either at the same session or at any adjourned session of the same meeting held within the 10 days next following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17476.

The governing body may at the session, if it deems such action to be for the best public interest, reject any and all bids, either written or oral, and withdraw the property from sale or lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17477.

(a) (1) If the governing board has complied with the provisions of this article, and no proposals are submitted or the proposals submitted do not conform with all terms and conditions specified in the resolution of intent to lease, the governing board may within one year thereafter, or one year after the passage of 30 days from the rejection of a public entity’s nonconforming proposal, as appropriate, lease such real property, together with any personal property located thereon, to any lessee, at a price not less than fair
 market value in accordance with any terms and conditions agreed upon by the governing board and the lessee, except that the term of a lease shall not exceed three years. Sections 17461, 17464, and 17466 to 17469, inclusive, and Sections 17471 to 17473, inclusive, shall not apply to the lease.

(2) The governing board may by majority vote delegate an officer or employee of the district, or any other third person, to secure a lessee and to negotiate the terms and conditions of the lease. However, the lease shall not be executed unless the governing board by majority vote, at a public meeting, approves the lease.

(3) If a public entity has submitted a nonconforming proposal, the governing board shall not take any action pursuant to this subdivision until 30 days after the rejection of the proposal.

(b) Subdivision (a)
 shall not apply if a public entity has submitted a proposal that does not conform with all the terms and conditions specified in the resolution of intent to lease, and if the public entity requests, in writing, within 30 days from the rejection of its proposal, that the governing board lease the real property, subject to the resolution of intent, in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17478.

Any resolution of acceptance of any bid made by the governing body authorizes and directs the president of the governing body, or other presiding officer, or the members thereof, to execute a deed or lease and to deliver it upon performance and compliance by the purchaser or lessee of all the terms or conditions of his or her contract to be performed concurrently therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17479.

Nothing in Sections 17455 to 17542, inclusive, shall prevent the governing board of any school district from acquiring, leasing or subleasing property pursuant to Section 1261 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17480.

The governing board of any school district may, without complying with any other provision of this article, let in the name of the district any buildings, grounds, or space therein, together with any personal property located thereon, not needed for school classroom buildings upon any terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the governing board of the district and the lessee thereof for a period not exceeding 30 separate or consecutive calendar days or portions thereof in each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17481.

In addition to any other authority to lease real property, the governing board of a school district, by a two-thirds vote of its members, may lease, for a term not exceeding three months, school district property having a residence thereon, which cannot be developed for district purposes because of the unavailability of funds. The lease shall be upon any terms and conditions that the parties thereto may agree and may be entered into without complying with any provisions in this code except as provided in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17482.

The governing board of a school district may, with the approval of the county board of supervisors, sell or lease any building of the district together with the site upon which the building is located, without complying with any other provisions of this article, provided that the county board of supervisors finds that all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The sale or lease is to be made to an incorporated nonprofit tax-exempt community or civic organization with a membership comprised predominantly
 of persons residing in the community in which the building and site are situated.

(b) The building is not suitable for school purposes.

(c) The building has an historic value and its preservation and utilization for the benefit of the community will best be ensured by sale or lease to an organization specified in subdivision (a).

(d) The sale or lease is to be executed for a consideration to enure to the school district reflecting the fair market value of the property, or its fair rental value, as the case may be, except that the sale may be executed for a consideration that is less than the fair market value of the property if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) More than 50 percent of the buildings on the site have been designated as
 historically significant by the State Historical Resources Commission.

(2) For a period of 25 years, commencing with the date that possession of the property is transferred, the building or buildings designated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be used and maintained for public benefit as an historical resource, and the site shall otherwise be available for public access and use, including, but not limited to, park and recreational uses. Any violation of this condition shall result in the automatic reversion of title to the property so transferred, without remuneration, to the transferor school district. The condition set forth in this paragraph does not prohibit any use of the site that is necessary or appropriate to its use and maintenance for historical purposes.

(3) The consideration paid is equal to or greater than the sum of the actual cost of the acquisition of the property
 by the school district and the actual cost of any capital improvements made to the property.

(e) Adequate provision has been made in connection with the sale or lease transaction to protect the district against all civil liabilities which might arise in connection with any use of the building and site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17483.

The failure to comply with the provisions of this article shall not invalidate the transfer or conveyance of real property to a purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17484.

The governing board of any school district, constituting the governing body of an elementary district, a high school district, or any two of those districts, may sell any building, structure, or other fixture, belonging to one of its respective districts to another district governed by it, for an amount to be fixed by the governing body, without advertisement for or receipt of bids or compliance with any other provisions of this code.

Whenever any property is sold under this section it shall be removed from the premises of
 the district selling it within 60 days from the date of the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Surplus School Playground, Playing Field, and Recreational Property [17485. - 17500.]

17485.

The Legislature is concerned that school playgrounds, playing fields, and recreational real property will be lost for those uses by the surrounding communities even if those communities in their planning process have assumed that the properties would be permanently available for recreational purposes. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to allow school districts to recover their investment in surplus property while making it possible for other agencies of government to acquire the property and keep it available for playground, playing field or other outdoor recreational and open-space purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17486.

This article shall apply to any schoolsite owned by a school district, which the governing board determines to sell or lease, and with respect to which the following conditions exist:

(a) Either the whole or a portion of the schoolsite consists of land which is used for school playground, playing field, or other outdoor recreational purposes and open-space land particularly suited for recreational purposes.

(b) The land described in subdivision (a) has been used for one or more of the purposes specified therein for at least eight years immediately preceding the date of the governing board’s determination to sell or lease the schoolsite.

(c) No other available publicly owned land in the vicinity of the schoolsite is adequate to meet the existing and foreseeable needs of the community for playground, playing field, or other outdoor recreational and open-space purposes, as determined by the governing body of the public agency which proposes to purchase or lease land from the school district, pursuant to Section 17492.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17487.

As used in this article, “schoolsite” means a parcel of land, or two or more contiguous parcels, which is owned by a school district. “Governing board” means the governing board of the school district which owns the schoolsite.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17488.

The governing board of any school district may sell or lease any schoolsite containing land described in Section 17486, and, if the governing board decides to sell or lease such land, it shall do so in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17489.

(a) (1) Other than as specified in paragraph (2), and notwithstanding Section 54222 of the Government Code, the governing board of a school district, before selling or leasing a schoolsite containing land described in Section 17486, excluding that portion of a schoolsite retained by the governing board of the school district pursuant to Section 17490, shall, if a charter school has not accepted an offer to purchase or lease the schoolsite pursuant to Section 17457.5, first offer to sell or lease that portion of the schoolsite consisting of land described in Section 17486, excluding that portion retained by the governing board of the school district pursuant to Section 17490, to the following public agencies in accordance
 with the following priorities:

(A) First, to any city within which the land may be situated.
